sl-SI: Območje pokritosti ščitnika za motoriste: Komolec; Komolec in podlaket; Komolec in zapestje (kombinirano); Podlaket (samostojno); Zapestje; Zapestje in podlaket; Drugo
el: Περιοχή κάλυψης προστατευτικού μοτοσικλέτας: Αγκώνας; Αγκώνας και αντιβράχιο; Αγκώνας και καρπός (συνδυασμός); Αντιβράχιο (αυτόνομο); Καρπός; Καρπός και αντιβράχιο; Άλλο
bg-BG: Зона на покритие на протектора за мотоциклет: Лакът; Лакът + предмишница; Лакът + китка (комбинирано); Предмишница (самостоятелно); Китка; Китка + предмишница; Друго
sv: Skyddsområde för motorcykel: Armbåge; Armbåge och underarm; Armbåge och handled (kombination); Underarm (fristående); Handled; Handled och underarm; Övrigt
fr: Zone couverte par la protection de moto: Coude; Coude + avant-bras; Coude + poignet (combiné); Avant-bras (autonome); Poignet; Poignet + avant-bras; Autre
da: Dækningsområde for motorcykelbeskytter: Albue; Albue og underarm; Albue og håndled (kombi); Underarm (selvstændig); Håndled; Håndled og underarm; Andet
th: พื้นที่ครอบคลุมของชุดการ์ดป้องกันรถจักรยานยนต์: ข้อศอก; ข้อศอก + ปลายแขน; ข้อศอก + ข้อมือ (คอมโบ); ปลายแขน (ชิ้นเดียว); ข้อมือ; ข้อมือ + ปลายแขน; อื่นๆ
nb: Motorsykkelbeskytterens dekningsområde: Albue; Albue og underarm; Albue og håndledd (kombinasjon); Underarm (frittstående); Håndledd; Håndledd og underarm; Annet
hu: Motoros védőfelszerelés lefedettségi területe: Könyök; Könyök + alkar; Könyök + csukló (kombó); Alkar (különálló); Csukló; Csukló + alkar; Egyéb
zh-CN: 摩托车防护覆盖范围: 手肘; 手肘 + 前臂; 手肘 + 手腕（组合）; 前臂（独立）; 手腕; 手腕 + 前臂; 其他
tr: Motosiklet koruma kapsama alanı: Dirsek; Dirsek + ön kol; Dirsek + bilek (kombinasyon); Ön kol (tek başına); Bilek; Bilek + ön kol; Diğer
pl: Obszar zasięgu osłony motocykla: Łokieć; Łokieć i przedramię; Łokieć i nadgarstek (combo); Przedramię (samodzielne); Nadgarstek; Nadgarstek i przedramię; Inne
en: Motorcycle guard coverage area: Elbow; Elbow + forearm; Elbow + wrist (combo); Forearm (standalone); Wrist; Wrist + forearm; Other
zh-TW: 機車護具覆蓋範圍: 手肘; 手肘 + 前臂; 手肘 + 手腕 (組合); 前臂 (獨立); 手腕; 手腕 + 前臂; 其他
sk-SK: Oblasť krytia ochranných krytov motocyklov: Lakeť; Lakeť a predlaktie; Lakeť a zápästie (kombinácia); Predlaktie (samostatne); Zápästie; Zápästie a predlaktie; Iné
pt-PT: área de cobertura do guarda de motociclos: Cotovelo; Cotovelo e antebraço; Cotovelo e pulso (conjunto); Antebraço (autónomo); Pulso; Pulso e antebraço; Outro
pt-BR: Protetor de motocicleta área de cobertura: Cotovelo; Cotovelo e antebraço; Cotovelo e pulso (combo); Antebraço (individual); Pulso; Pulso e antebraço; Outros
ja: バイクガードのカバーエリア: 肘; 肘 + 前腕; 肘 + 手首 (コンボ); 前腕 (単体); 手首; 手首 + 前腕; その他
fi: Moottoripyörän suojan peittoalue: Kyynärpää; Kyynärpää ja kyynärvarsi; Kyynärpää ja ranne (yhdistelmä); Kyynärvarsi (erillinen); Ranne; Ranne ja kyynärvarsi; Muu
nl: Motorbeschermer dekkingsgebied: Elleboog; Elleboog en onderarm; Elleboog + pols (combo); Onderarm (losstaand); Pols; Pols + onderarm; Overig
ko: 오토바이 가드 커버 범위: 팔꿈치; 팔꿈치 및 하박; 팔꿈치 및 손목(콤보); 하박(독립형); 손목; 손목 및 하박; 기타
es: Zona de cobertura del protector para motocicleta: Codo; Codo + antebrazo; Codo + muñeca (combo); Antebrazo (independiente); Muñeca; Muñeca + antebrazo; Otro
lt-LT: Motociklo apsaugos padengimo sritis: Alkūnė; Alkūnė ir dilbis; Alkūnė ir riešas (kombinuota); Dilbis (atskiras); Riešas; Riešas ir dilbis; Kita
de: Abdeckungsbereich des Motorradschutzes: Ellenbogen; Ellenbogen + Unterarm; Ellenbogen + Handgelenk (Kombi); Unterarm (einzeln); Handgelenk; Handgelenk + Unterarm; Sonstige
hr-HR: Područje pokrivenosti motociklističkog čuvara: Lakat; Lakat + podlaktica; Lakat + zglob (kombinacija); Podlaktica (samostalno); Zglob; Zglob + podlaktica; Ostalo
ro-RO: Zona de protecție acoperită de protecția pentru motocicletă: Cot; Cot și antebraț; Cot și încheietură (combo); Antebraț (de sine stătător); Încheietură; Încheietură și antebraț; Altele
cs: Oblast pokrytí motocyklové ochrany: Loket; Loket a předloktí; Loket a zápěstí (kombinace); Předloktí (samostatné); Zápěstí; Zápěstí a předloktí; Jiné
it: Area di copertura della protezione da moto: Gomito; Gomito e avambraccio; Gomito e polso (combo); Avambraccio (singolo); Polso; Polso e avambraccio; Altro
vi: Khu vực bảo vệ xe mô tô: Khuỷu tay; Khuỷu tay và cẳng tay; Khuỷu tay và cổ tay (kết hợp); Cẳng tay (độc lập); Cổ tay; Cổ tay và cẳng tay; Khác
ru: Область защиты мотоциклетной защиты: Локоть; Локоть и предплечье; Локоть и запястье (комбо); Предплечье (отдельно); Запястье; Запястье и предплечье; Другое